Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1198.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(4) and (5) of the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act--* * *(4) "Public body" means the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, any of its political subdivisions, any authority created by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and any instrumentality or agency of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania[.] or a public utility.(4.1) "Public utility" means a public utility as defined under 66 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions). The term does 1234567891011121314151617181920 not include an electric distribution company as defined under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2803 (relating to definitions).(5) "Public work" means construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration and/or repair work other than maintenance work, done under contract and paid for in whole or in part out of the funds of a public body where the estimated cost of the total project is in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), but shall not include work performed under a rehabilitation or manpower training program, and with regard to a public utility, means only underground infrastructure work.* * *(6.1) "Underground infrastructure work" means construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair work, other than maintenance work, including traffic control, related to an underground system of distribution, conveyance, transmission, diversion, collection, treatment or storage that is owned, used or maintained by a public utility.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1198PN1468 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819